New York, session 2025-2026, A6201.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Paragraph d of subdivision 3 of section 74 of the public 2 officers law, as amended by section 7 of part K of chapter 286 of the 3 laws of 2016, is amended to read as follows: 4 d. No officer or employee of a state agency, member of the legislature 5 or legislative employee should use or attempt to use [his or her] their 6 official position to secure unwarranted privileges or exemptions for 7 [himself or herself] themself or others, including but not limited to, 8 the misappropriation to [himself, herself] themself or to others of the 9 property, services or other resources of the state for private business 10 or other compensated non-governmental purposes, or engaging in acts of 11 unlawful discrimination, including but not limited to, making unwelcome 12 sexual advances, or requests for sexual favors, or engaging in any 13 verbal, non-verbal, or physical conduct of a sexual nature or that 14 creates a hostile, intimidating, or offensive workplace or suffering or 15 permitting others to do so in the workplace or at workplace-related 16 events. 17 § 2. Subdivision 8 of section 94 of the executive law is amended by 18 adding a new paragraph (g) to read as follows: 19 (g) In the discretion of the commission, the training developed and 20 administered in accordance with this subdivision shall not be required 21 to include or cover material that is the subject of other mandatory EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD07290-03-6 A. 6201--A 2 1 training administered regularly to the individuals subject to the 2 provisions of this section. 3 § 3. This act shall take effect on the thirtieth day after it shall 4 have become a law.